Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 3.1 Cooperative Service Among School Districts
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-3.1-1.
Purpose of this chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is threefold: to assist school districts within the state to establish cooperative service operations and the method of administering those operations; to provide for the delivery of administrative and instructional services desired by school districts; and to provide that the department of elementary and secondary education offer technical assistance to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 246, § 1.

16-3.1-2.
Agreements.

Any school committee, acting for or on behalf of its district, may enter into an agreement with one or more other school committees to conduct jointly instructional education programs and/or administrative functions, provided that the agreement has been reviewed and is recommended by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and has the approval of each participating school committee.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide technical assistance to any school districts expressing interest in the formation of cooperative services. It shall review proposed agreements and make recommendations prior to the submission of the agreements to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education for his or her consideration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 246, § 1.

16-3.1-3.
Rules and regulations.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall adopt regulations regarding all aspects of the agreement. Each agreement shall fully describe the services to be rendered, the terms by which each school district shall share in the cost of the services, and shall provide for a method of governing the services which services shall be considered a part of the public school system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 246, § 1.

16-3.1-4.
Financial incentives.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may provide for special grants which it may deem necessary to stimulate the formation of cooperative service arrangements, and it may establish the level of subsidy that it deems appropriate to continue the operation of any cooperative service area.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 246, § 1.

16-3.1-5.
Termination of participation.

Each original agreement shall provide for the disposition, upon termination, of any unencumbered funds, equipment, supplies, and property, real or personal, held pursuant to the agreement. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall resolve any and all disputes among participating school districts which the governing body is unable to resolve.

Any school district that is a party to a cooperative service agreement may terminate its obligation at the end of any fiscal year by written notice to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and all other parties, provided that notice is received at least six (6) months before the start of the state’s next ensuing fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 246, § 1.

16-3.1-6.
Collective bargaining agreements unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall allow any school district to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 246, § 1.

16-3.1-7.
Newport County regional special education program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the towns of Middletown, Portsmouth, Tiverton, and Little Compton are authorized and empowered to continue their cooperative efforts to provide special education programs and diagnostic services required by law or regulation, and related functions, through participation in the Newport County regional special education program and, for that purpose, to assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of schools or designee, acting as a regional board duties, responsibilities, and powers as the committees may deem necessary or desirable for the conduct, administration, and management of the regional special education program. In matters pertaining to the regional special education program, the regional board shall constitute and act as the school board referred to in chapter 24 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 1.

16-3.1-8.
Regional center collaborative — Northern Rhode Island.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the cities and towns of Lincoln, Cumberland, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Woonsocket, Smithfield, North Smithfield, North Providence, Johnston, Foster, Glocester, Foster-Glocester regional school district, and Burrillville are authorized and empowered to continue and/or initiate cooperative efforts to provide special education programs and diagnostic services required by law or regulation, to utilize technology, including without limitation television, to provide limited interest curriculum, and to provide programs for the gifted and talented, all on a collaborative basis. The various school committees may assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of schools or designee, acting as a regional board, any duties, responsibilities, and powers that the committees may deem necessary for the conduct, administration, and management of the regional center collaborative of northern Rhode Island.

The Northern Rhode Island Collaborative, as a nonprofit corporation, shall have all the powers provided in the R.I. Nonprofit Corporation Act (RI Gen. Laws §

7-6-1

, et seq.):

To purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, mortgage, finance, improve, and use a certain parcel of realty and fixtures thereon located at 300 George Washington Highway, Smithfield, Rhode Island, and any parcels of realty contiguous thereto.

To create a wholly-owned subsidiary entity for the purpose of facilitating any of the powers, duties and responsibilities referred to above.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 515, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 471, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 17.

16-3.1-9.
Regional collaborative.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the towns and school districts of Westerly, New Shoreham, Chariho regional school district, Narragansett, Jamestown, South Kingstown, North Kingstown, East Greenwich, and the Exeter-West Greenwich regional school district are authorized and empowered to continue and/or initiate cooperative efforts to provide services included but not limited to special education programs and diagnostic services required by law or regulation; to utilize technology without restriction; to provide limited interest curriculum; and to provide programs for the gifted and talented, all on a collaborative basis. The intent of the regional collaborative is to provide the opportunity for all children to receive educational services locally. The various school committees may assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of schools or designee, acting as a regional board, any duties, responsibilities and powers that the committees may deem necessary for the conduct, administration, and management of the regional collaborative — southern Rhode Island. A bylaw committee shall be named by the commission to study the feasibility of creating a south county regional network center to provide multiple services for students with disabilities. The committee’s membership should consist of three (3) special education directors, three (3) superintendents, three (3) parents, and two (2) other interested persons from the participating towns and school districts and any other person that the governing regional board may deem necessary. This regionalized collaborative shall enjoy any regionalized bonus aid wherever applicable to collaboratives or cooperative service areas.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 620, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 23; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 23; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 28; P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 1.

16-3.1-9.1.
Regional collaborative — West Bay Rhode Island.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the towns and school districts of West Warwick, Providence, Warwick, Coventry, Cranston, Scituate, Foster-Glocester regional school district, Foster, and Glocester are authorized and empowered to study and/or continue and/or initiate cooperative efforts to provide services included but not limited to special education programs and diagnostic services required by law or regulation; to utilize technology without restriction; to provide limited interest curriculum; and to provide programs for the gifted and talented, all on a collaborative basis in an effort to improve efficiency and cost effectiveness. The intent of the regional collaborative is to provide the opportunity for all children to receive educational services locally. The various school committees may assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of schools or designee, acting as a regional board any duties, responsibilities and powers that the committees may deem necessary for the conduct, administration and management of the regional collaborative — West Bay Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 1.

16-3.1-10.
Regional center collaborative — East Bay Educational Collaborative.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the cities and towns of Barrington, Bristol, East Providence, Little Compton, Middletown, Newport, Portsmouth, Tiverton, and Warren are authorized and empowered to continue and/or initiate cooperative efforts to provide educational programs and/or services on a collaborative basis. The various school committees may assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of schools or designee, acting as a regional board of directors, any duties, responsibilities, and powers that the committees may deem necessary for the conduct, administration, and management of the East Bay Educational Collaborative.

Notwithstanding the above enumerated powers, duties and responsibilities referred to above and in chapter 3.1 of this title, the East Bay Educational Collaborative, as a nonprofit corporation incorporated pursuant to the R.I. Nonprofit Corporation Act (RI Gen Laws §

7-6-1

, et seq.), shall have the authority to:

Purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise, or bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with real estate, including their current site location, to wit, 317 Market Street, Warren, Rhode Island, or such other site as meets the administrative and/or operational needs of the East Bay Educational Collaborative, subject to the approval of five (5) of the eight (8) school committees of the member districts of the collaborative or a majority of the school committees that are members of the collaborative at the time.

Sell, convey, mortgage, finance, bond, lend, lease, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets, both real or personal, subject to the approval of five (5) of the eight (8) school committees of the member districts of the collaborative or a majority of the school committees that are members of the collaborative at the time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 17.

16-3.1-11.
Urban collaborative.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, East Providence, Central Falls and other Rhode Island school districts as may be approved for inclusion by existing member districts in accordance with collaborative bylaws are authorized and empowered to continue and/or initiate cooperative efforts to provide alternate education programs and/or diagnostic services required by law or regulation for students achieving limited success in traditional settings and to do all things necessary including, but not limited to utilization of technology, including television, all on a collaborative basis. The various school committees may assign and delegate to their respective school committee chairs or designee or superintendents of schools or designee, acting as a regional board any duties, responsibilities, and powers that the committees may deem necessary for the conduct, administration, and management of the urban collaborative. Beginning on July 1, 2013 the urban collaborative shall be funded pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7.2-3

. The state share of the permanent foundation education aid shall be paid directly to the urban collaborative pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7.2-7

. The local school district shall transfer the difference between the calculated state share of the permanent foundation education aid and the amount calculated pursuant to the provisions of §

16-7.2-7

to the urban collaborative, until the transition of the state share is complete. In addition, the local school district shall pay the local share of education funding to the urban collaborative as outlined in §

16-7.2-5

.

The urban collaborative shall be eligible to receive other aids, grants, Medicaid revenue, and any other revenue according to Rhode Island law, as though it were a school district. Federal aid received by the state shall be used to benefit students in the urban collaborative, if the school qualifies for the aid, as though it were a school district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 9; P.L. 2013, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 352, § 1.

16-3.1-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 173, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001 ch. 86, § 29, effective July 6, 2001.

16-3.1-13.
Reporting.

Any collaborative established under this chapter shall implement a uniform system of accounting in compliance with §

16-2-9.3

to track their expenditures and investments and file a report on said expenditures and investments by October 1, of each year, with the Rhode Island board of regents for elementary and secondary education, the office of the auditor general, the Rhode Island senate committee on education and finance, the Rhode Island house of representatives committee on health, education and welfare and finance and local school committees. Each collaborative shall also file periodic reports, to the board of regents, the senate education committee and the house health, education and welfare committee, detailing their activities and programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 433, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 149, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 192, § 2.

16-3.1-14.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Cooperative Service Among School Districts Act of 2010.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-15.
Declaration of purpose.

A collaborative approach to the dual mission of educational effectiveness and business efficiency is the purpose of this educational collaborative act. The goal is to maximize both educational effectiveness and business services which will lead to cost savings. The educational collaborative system will allow school districts to more appropriately concentrate on educating at the most local level, which should be their prime mission. This system can be defined as including not only the regional educational collaboratives and their boards, local district school committees and district superintendents, operating as private, nonprofit educational service agencies, but also the board of regents and the commissioner of the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education.

As used herein, the terms “collaborative,” “educational collaborative,” “regional collaborative,” and combinations thereof, shall be deemed to refer to the collaboratives established pursuant to this chapter, and recognized as 501(c)3 nonprofit corporations incorporated pursuant to the Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation Act, Rhode Island general laws §

7-6-1

, et seq. Nothing in this legislation is intended to erode the legal status of the regional collaboratives as 501(c)3’s and their boards of directors must be cognizant to their legal and fiduciary responsibilities to these enterprises.

The purpose of this act is also to bring the efforts of the members of the educational collaborative system, listed in subsection (a) above, into appropriate and productive dialogue and relationship with one another, in order to bring about the business efficiencies and quality instructional practice the legislature desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-16.
Financial incentives.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may provide for special grants that it may deem necessary to stimulate and encourage the development of cooperative service agreements that would be administered by the area educational collaborative. The regents may also establish an ongoing level of subsidy that it deems appropriate to continue the operation of any cooperative service area.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-17.
Rules and regulations.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall adopt rules and regulations regarding all aspects of the educational collaboratives mission and goals.

Instructional education programs and/or administrative and/or best business practice plans will be submitted to, and approved by, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

Each educational collaborative will submit a plan to the board of regents for approval by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, that will increase efficiencies and economies of scale in providing instructional services. The plan will incorporate best practices from business, reflect a regional approach and accompanying volume increase, and shall include, but not be limited to, measures concerning:

Teacher training programs and staff development;

Special education programs and diagnostic services required by law or regulation and related functions;

Programs for the gifted and talented;

Programs for students who are at risk of suspension or expulsion;

Development of shared instructional services;

Act as regional or statewide administrative unit, or enabling unit, or as a participant of a joint purchasing agreement or agreements established pursuant to §

16-2-9.2

, for such functions as transportation, cooperative purchasing of food, and other noninstructional support services, such as the purchasing of oil, gas, electricity, health care contracts, supplies, payroll and other business operations, as may be appropriate;

Any other consolidation of services and purchasing that achieves efficiencies and cost savings.

An educational collaborative may contract with a school district that is not a participating member, or another educational collaborative. Districts may contract any of their functions, individually and collectively, in whole or in part, to a regional collaborative when such contracting will increase efficiencies and economies of scale in providing instructional and business services.

The board of regents should consider the progress made or planned as reported and provide for special grants to stimulate the formation of cooperative service arrangements, or a level of subsidy appropriate to launch or continue the operation of any cooperative service area.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-18.
Board of directors.

Each educational collaborative’s board of directors will set policies and programs consistent with the aims and intents of this legislation for approval by the department of education and developed in conjunction with educational collaborative staff. Each participating school committee will appoint one member to the respective governing board. The board of directors will include an odd number of members. In the case of educational collaboratives with an even number of participating school districts, regional school districts may appoint two (2) members. School committees can appoint anyone they choose to the board of directors from their membership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-19.
Collective bargaining agreements unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall allow any school district to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-20.
Building ownership.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit any of the five (5) educational collaboratives from purchasing, leasing, taking by gift, or otherwise acquiring, own, hold, mortgage, finance, improve, and use real estate for purposes of furthering their mission and goals to meet their administrative and operational needs. An affirmative majority of the educational collaborative’s board of directors will be needed to purchase, lease, mortgage or finance real estate. Such real estate may be exempt from local property taxes as described in Rhode Island general laws §

44-3-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 108, § 1.

16-3.1-21.
YouthBuild Preparatory Academy.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the school committees of the cities of Providence and Central Falls are authorized and empowered to initiate and implement cooperative efforts, including, but not limited to, collaborative use of technology, to provide an alternative, diploma-granting secondary education program to be known as the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy (hereinafter “academy”) for their respective resident students ages fourteen (14) to twenty-one (21) who are achieving limited success in traditional settings.

The purpose of this section is to further enable the school committees of the cities of Providence and Central Falls:

To support students at risk of school failure, with a special focus on the diverse needs of urban students, to create an environment for individual growth, and to cultivate social and emotional development;

To offer a rigorous and relevant standards-driven, experiential learning community, and to provide college and career preparatory education based on guided, project-based core curriculum with an emphasis on education, human services, and community development; and

To provide an alternative learning environment for disconnected and at-risk students desiring to complete their academic careers in a setting that offers comprehensive support services, accelerated academic curriculum, leadership development, and life skills that will enable them to become resilient, self-sufficient adults.

The YouthBuild Preparatory Academy shall be operated under the provisions of this chapter. Students attending the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy will do so on a full-time basis with the costs for their education at the academy being shared by the state and the district of residence as described in §

16-7.2-5

.

The YouthBuild Preparatory Academy shall be governed by a board of trustees; with the exception of those powers and duties reserved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, the board of education, and the school committees of the cities of Providence and Central Falls, the board of trustees shall have the powers and duties of school committees.

Composition of the board of trustees. The board of trustees of the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy shall consist of:

One appointee of the board of trustees of the Central Falls school district;

One appointee of the school board of the city of Providence; and

The council on elementary and secondary education shall appoint the remaining members of the board of trustees of the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy with input from the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. Prior to enrolling students, the board of trustees shall present a plan for the governance, administration, and operation of the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy, including the nature and extent of parental, professional educator, and community involvement in the governance and operation of the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy, and the means of ensuring accountability, to the commissioner, the Providence and Central Falls school districts, and the council on elementary and secondary education.

The academy authorized under this section shall be subject to educational and financial standards and reporting as deemed necessary by the department of elementary and secondary education.

The YouthBuild Preparatory Academy shall be eligible to receive other aid, grants, Medicaid revenue, and any other revenue according to Rhode Island law, as though it is a school district. Federal aid received by the state shall be used to benefit students in the YouthBuild Preparatory Academy, if the school qualifies for the aid, as though it is a school district.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 210, § 1.